Maryland, session 2025, SB0710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–212.1.
(a) (1) In this section, “vessel” means any watercraft that is used or is capable
of being used as a means of transportation on water or ice.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0710*

SENATE BILL 710
(2) “Vessel” does not include a seaplane.
(b) A person may not:
(1) DRIVE, OPERATE, OR CONTROL A MOTOR VEHICLE OR VESSEL IN
A CRIMINALLY NEGLIGENT MANNER; OR
(2) cause a life–threatening injury to another as a result of the person’s
driving, operating, or controlling a motor vehicle or vessel in a criminally negligent manner.
(c) For the purpose of this section, a person acts in a criminally negligent manner
with respect to a result or a circumstance when:
(1) the person should be aware, but fails to perceive, that the person’s
conduct creates a substantial and unjustifiable risk that such a result will occur; and
(2) the failure to perceive constitutes a gross deviation from the standard
of care that would be exercised by a reasonable person.
(d) It is not a violation of this section for a person to:
(1) DRIVE, OPERATE, OR CONTROL A MOTOR VEHICLE OR VESSEL IN
A NEGLIGENT MANNER AS DEFINED IN § 21–901.1 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE; OR
(2) cause a life–threatening injury to another as a result of the person’s
driving, operating, or controlling a motor vehicle or vessel in a negligent manner.
(e) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 6 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
(2) A person who violates SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF this section is guilty of
a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or a fine
not exceeding $5,000 or both.
3–212.2.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT DRIVE, OPERATE, OR CONTROL A MOTOR VEHICLE
IN A CRIMINALLY NEGLIGENT MANNER.
(B) FOR THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON ACTS IN A CRIMINALLY
NEGLIGENT MANNER WHEN:

SENATE BILL 710 3
(1) THE PERSON SHOULD BE AWARE, BUT FAILS TO PERCEIVE, THAT
THE PERSON’S CONDUCT CREATES A SUBSTANTIAL AND UNJUSTIFIABLE RISK TO
THE SAFETY OF PERSONS OR PROPERTY; AND
(2) THE FAILURE TO PERCEIVE CONSTITUTES A GROSS DEVIATION
FROM THE STANDARD OF CARE THAT WOULD BE EXERCISED BY A REASONABLE
PERSON.
(C) IT IS NOT A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION FOR A PERSON TO DRIVE,
OPERATE, OR CONTROL A MOTOR VEHICLE IN A NEGLIGENT MANNER AS DEFINED IN
§ 21–901.1 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(D) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IS GUILTY
OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 6 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.